Hawaii statutes.
§226-22 Objective and policies for
socio-cultural advancement--social services. (a) Planning for the State's
socio-cultural advancement with regard to social services shall be directed
towards the achievement of the objective of improved public and private social
services and activities that enable individuals, families, and groups to become
more self-reliant and confident to improve their well-being.

(b) To achieve the social service objective,
it shall be the policy of the State to:

(1) Assist individuals, especially those in need of
attaining a minimally adequate standard of living and those confronted by
social and economic hardship conditions, through social services and activities
within the State's fiscal capacities.

(2) Promote coordination and integrative approaches
among public and private agencies and programs to jointly address social
problems that will enable individuals, families, and groups to deal effectively
with social problems and to enhance their participation in society.

(3) Facilitate the adjustment of new residents,
especially recently arrived immigrants, into Hawaii's communities.

(4) Promote alternatives to institutional care in the
provision of long-term care for elder and disabled populations.

(5) Support public and private efforts to prevent
domestic abuse and child molestation, and assist victims of abuse and neglect.

(6) Promote programs which assist people in need of
family planning services to enable them to meet their needs. [L 1978, c 100, pt
of §2; am L 1986, c 276, §21; am L 1990, c 67, §8]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next